Illinois, session 104th, HB5442.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Public Aid Code is amended by 5changing Section 5A-12.7 as follows: 6    (305 ILCS 5/5A-12.7)7    Sec. 5A-12.7. Continuation of hospital access payments on 8and after July 1, 2020.9    (a) To preserve and improve access to hospital services, 10for hospital services rendered on and after July 1, 2020, the 11Department shall, except for hospitals described in subsection 12(b) of Section 5A-3, make payments to hospitals or require 13capitated managed care organizations to make payments as set 14forth in this Section. Payments under this Section are not due 15and payable, however, until: (i) the methodologies described 16in this Section are approved by the federal government in an 17appropriate State Plan amendment or directed payment preprint; 18and (ii) the assessment imposed under this Article is 19determined to be a permissible tax under Title XIX of the 20Social Security Act. In determining the hospital access 21payments authorized under subsection (g) of this Section, if a 22hospital ceases to qualify for payments from the pool, the 23payments for all hospitals continuing to qualify for payments   HB5442- 2 -LRB104 20236 KTG 33687 b1from such pool shall be uniformly adjusted to fully expend the 2aggregate net amount of the pool, with such adjustment being 3effective on the first day of the second month following the 4date the hospital ceases to receive payments from such pool.5    (b) Amounts moved into claims-based rates and distributed 6in accordance with Section 14-12 shall remain in those 7claims-based rates.8    (c) Graduate medical education.9        (1) The calculation of graduate medical education 10    payments shall be based on the hospital's Medicare cost 11    report ending in Calendar Year 2018, as reported in the 12    Healthcare Cost Report Information System file, release 13    date September 30, 2019. An Illinois hospital reporting 14    intern and resident cost on its Medicare cost report shall 15    be eligible for graduate medical education payments.16        (2) Each hospital's annualized Medicaid Intern 17    Resident Cost is calculated using annualized intern and 18    resident total costs obtained from Worksheet B Part I, 19    Columns 21 and 22 the sum of Lines 30-43, 50-76, 90-93, 20    96-98, and 105-112 multiplied by the percentage that the 21    hospital's Medicaid days (Worksheet S3 Part I, Column 7, 22    Lines 2, 3, 4, 14, 16-18, and 32) comprise of the 23    hospital's total days (Worksheet S3 Part I, Column 8, 24    Lines 14, 16-18, and 32).25        (3) An annualized Medicaid indirect medical education 26    (IME) payment is calculated for each hospital using its   HB5442- 3 -LRB104 20236 KTG 33687 b1    IME payments (Worksheet E Part A, Line 29, Column 1) 2    multiplied by the percentage that its Medicaid days 3    (Worksheet S3 Part I, Column 7, Lines 2, 3, 4, 14, 16-18, 4    and 32) comprise of its Medicare days (Worksheet S3 Part 5    I, Column 6, Lines 2, 3, 4, 14, and 16-18).6        (4) For each hospital, its annualized Medicaid Intern 7    Resident Cost and its annualized Medicaid IME payment are 8    summed, and, except as capped at 120% of the average cost 9    per intern and resident for all qualifying hospitals as 10    calculated under this paragraph, is multiplied by the 11    applicable reimbursement factor as described in this 12    paragraph, to determine the hospital's final graduate 13    medical education payment. Each hospital's average cost 14    per intern and resident shall be calculated by summing its 15    total annualized Medicaid Intern Resident Cost plus its 16    annualized Medicaid IME payment and dividing that amount 17    by the hospital's total Full Time Equivalent Residents and 18    Interns. If the hospital's average per intern and resident 19    cost is greater than 120% of the same calculation for all 20    qualifying hospitals, the hospital's per intern and 21    resident cost shall be capped at 120% of the average cost 22    for all qualifying hospitals.23            (A) For the period of July 1, 2020 through 24        December 31, 2022, the applicable reimbursement factor 25        shall be 22.6%. 26            (B) Beginning January 1, 2023, the applicable   HB5442- 4 -LRB104 20236 KTG 33687 b1        reimbursement factor shall be 35% for all qualified 2        safety-net hospitals, as defined in Section 5-5e.1 of 3        this Code, and all hospitals with 100 or more Full Time 4        Equivalent Residents and Interns, as reported on the 5        hospital's Medicare cost report ending in Calendar 6        Year 2018, and for all other qualified hospitals the 7        applicable reimbursement factor shall be 30%. 8    (d) Fee-for-service supplemental payments. For the period 9of July 1, 2020 through December 31, 2022, each Illinois 10hospital shall receive an annual payment equal to the amounts 11below, to be paid in 12 equal installments on or before the 12seventh State business day of each month, except that no 13payment shall be due within 30 days after the later of the date 14of notification of federal approval of the payment 15methodologies required under this Section or any waiver 16required under 42 CFR 433.68, at which time the sum of amounts 17required under this Section prior to the date of notification 18is due and payable.19        (1) For critical access hospitals, $385 per covered 20    inpatient day contained in paid fee-for-service claims and 21    $530 per paid fee-for-service outpatient claim for dates 22    of service in Calendar Year 2019 in the Department's 23    Enterprise Data Warehouse as of May 11, 2020.24        (2) For safety-net hospitals, $960 per covered 25    inpatient day contained in paid fee-for-service claims and 26    $625 per paid fee-for-service outpatient claim for dates   HB5442- 5 -LRB104 20236 KTG 33687 b1    of service in Calendar Year 2019 in the Department's 2    Enterprise Data Warehouse as of May 11, 2020.3        (3) For long term acute care hospitals, $295 per 4    covered inpatient day contained in paid fee-for-service 5    claims for dates of service in Calendar Year 2019 in the 6    Department's Enterprise Data Warehouse as of May 11, 2020.7        (4) For freestanding psychiatric hospitals, $125 per 8    covered inpatient day contained in paid fee-for-service 9    claims and $130 per paid fee-for-service outpatient claim 10    for dates of service in Calendar Year 2019 in the 11    Department's Enterprise Data Warehouse as of May 11, 2020.12        (5) For freestanding rehabilitation hospitals, $355 13    per covered inpatient day contained in paid 14    fee-for-service claims for dates of service in Calendar 15    Year 2019 in the Department's Enterprise Data Warehouse as 16    of May 11, 2020.17        (6) For all general acute care hospitals and high 18    Medicaid hospitals as defined in subsection (f), $350 per 19    covered inpatient day for dates of service in Calendar 20    Year 2019 contained in paid fee-for-service claims and 21    $620 per paid fee-for-service outpatient claim in the 22    Department's Enterprise Data Warehouse as of May 11, 2020.23        (7) Alzheimer's treatment access payment. Each 24    Illinois academic medical center or teaching hospital, as 25    defined in Section 5-5e.2 of this Code, that is identified 26    as the primary hospital affiliate of one of the Regional   HB5442- 6 -LRB104 20236 KTG 33687 b1    Alzheimer's Disease Assistance Centers, as designated by 2    the Alzheimer's Disease Assistance Act and identified in 3    the Department of Public Health's Alzheimer's Disease 4    State Plan dated December 2016, shall be paid an 5    Alzheimer's treatment access payment equal to the product 6    of the qualifying hospital's State Fiscal Year 2018 total 7    inpatient fee-for-service days multiplied by the 8    applicable Alzheimer's treatment rate of $226.30 for 9    hospitals located in Cook County and $116.21 for hospitals 10    located outside Cook County.11    (d-2) Fee-for-service supplemental payments. Beginning 12January 1, 2023, each Illinois hospital shall receive an 13annual payment equal to the amounts listed below, to be paid in 1412 equal installments on or before the seventh State business 15day of each month, except that no payment shall be due within 1630 days after the later of the date of notification of federal 17approval of the payment methodologies required under this 18Section or any waiver required under 42 CFR 433.68, at which 19time the sum of amounts required under this Section prior to 20the date of notification is due and payable. The Department 21may adjust the rates in paragraphs (1) through (7) to comply 22with the federal upper payment limits, with such adjustments 23being determined so that the total estimated spending by 24hospital class, under such adjusted rates, remains 25substantially similar to the total estimated spending under 26the original rates set forth in this subsection.   HB5442- 7 -LRB104 20236 KTG 33687 b1        (1) For critical access hospitals, as defined in 2    subsection (f), $750 per covered inpatient day contained 3    in paid fee-for-service claims and $750 per paid 4    fee-for-service outpatient claim for dates of service in 5    Calendar Year 2019 in the Department's Enterprise Data 6    Warehouse as of August 6, 2021.7        (2) For safety-net hospitals, as described in 8    subsection (f), $1,350 per inpatient day contained in paid 9    fee-for-service claims and $1,350 per paid fee-for-service 10    outpatient claim for dates of service in Calendar Year 11    2019 in the Department's Enterprise Data Warehouse as of 12    August 6, 2021.13        (3) For long term acute care hospitals, $550 per 14    covered inpatient day contained in paid fee-for-service 15    claims for dates of service in Calendar Year 2019 in the 16    Department's Enterprise Data Warehouse as of August 6, 17    2021.18        (4) For freestanding psychiatric hospitals, $200 per 19    covered inpatient day contained in paid fee-for-service 20    claims and $200 per paid fee-for-service outpatient claim 21    for dates of service in Calendar Year 2019 in the 22    Department's Enterprise Data Warehouse as of August 6, 23    2021.24        (5) For freestanding rehabilitation hospitals, $550 25    per covered inpatient day contained in paid 26    fee-for-service claims and $125 per paid fee-for-service   HB5442- 8 -LRB104 20236 KTG 33687 b1    outpatient claim for dates of service in Calendar Year 2    2019 in the Department's Enterprise Data Warehouse as of 3    August 6, 2021.4        (6) For all general acute care hospitals and high 5    Medicaid hospitals as defined in subsection (f), $500 per 6    covered inpatient day for dates of service in Calendar 7    Year 2019 contained in paid fee-for-service claims and 8    $500 per paid fee-for-service outpatient claim in the 9    Department's Enterprise Data Warehouse as of August 6, 10    2021.11        (7) For public hospitals, as defined in subsection 12    (f), $275 per covered inpatient day contained in paid 13    fee-for-service claims and $275 per paid fee-for-service 14    outpatient claim for dates of service in Calendar Year 15    2019 in the Department's Enterprise Data Warehouse as of 16    August 6, 2021.17        (8) Alzheimer's treatment access payment. Each 18    Illinois academic medical center or teaching hospital, as 19    defined in Section 5-5e.2 of this Code, that is identified 20    as the primary hospital affiliate of one of the Regional 21    Alzheimer's Disease Assistance Centers, as designated by 22    the Alzheimer's Disease Assistance Act and identified in 23    the Department of Public Health's Alzheimer's Disease 24    State Plan dated December 2016, shall be paid an 25    Alzheimer's treatment access payment equal to the product 26    of the qualifying hospital's Calendar Year 2019 total   HB5442- 9 -LRB104 20236 KTG 33687 b1    inpatient fee-for-service days, in the Department's 2    Enterprise Data Warehouse as of August 6, 2021, multiplied 3    by the applicable Alzheimer's treatment rate of $244.37 4    for hospitals located in Cook County and $312.03 for 5    hospitals located outside Cook County.6    (e) The Department shall require managed care 7organizations (MCOs) to make directed payments and 8pass-through payments according to this Section. Each calendar 9year, the Department shall require MCOs to pay the maximum 10amount out of these funds as allowed as pass-through payments 11under federal regulations. The Department shall require MCOs 12to make such pass-through payments as specified in this 13Section. The Department shall require the MCOs to pay the 14remaining amounts as directed Payments as specified in this 15Section. The Department shall issue payments to the 16Comptroller by the seventh business day of each month for all 17MCOs that are sufficient for MCOs to make the directed 18payments and pass-through payments according to this Section. 19The Department shall require the MCOs to make pass-through 20payments and directed payments using electronic funds 21transfers (EFT), if the hospital provides the information 22necessary to process such EFTs, in accordance with directions 23provided monthly by the Department, within 7 business days of 24the date the funds are paid to the MCOs, as indicated by the 25"Paid Date" on the website of the Office of the Comptroller if 26the funds are paid by EFT and the MCOs have received directed   HB5442- 10 -LRB104 20236 KTG 33687 b1payment instructions. If funds are not paid through the 2Comptroller by EFT, payment must be made within 7 business 3days of the date actually received by the MCO. The MCO will be 4considered to have paid the pass-through payments when the 5payment remittance number is generated or the date the MCO 6sends the check to the hospital, if EFT information is not 7supplied. If an MCO is late in paying a pass-through payment or 8directed payment as required under this Section (including any 9extensions granted by the Department), it shall pay a penalty, 10unless waived by the Department for reasonable cause, to the 11Department equal to 5% of the amount of the pass-through 12payment or directed payment not paid on or before the due date 13plus 5% of the portion thereof remaining unpaid on the last day 14of each 30-day period thereafter. Payments to MCOs that would 15be paid consistent with actuarial certification and enrollment 16in the absence of the increased capitation payments under this 17Section shall not be reduced as a consequence of payments made 18under this subsection. The Department shall publish and 19maintain on its website for a period of no less than 8 calendar 20quarters, the quarterly calculation of directed payments and 21pass-through payments owed to each hospital from each MCO. All 22calculations and reports shall be posted no later than the 23first day of the quarter for which the payments are to be 24issued.25    (f)(1) For purposes of allocating the funds included in 26capitation payments to MCOs, Illinois hospitals shall be   HB5442- 11 -LRB104 20236 KTG 33687 b1divided into the following classes as defined in 2administrative rules:3        (A) Beginning July 1, 2020 through December 31, 2022, 4    critical access hospitals. Beginning January 1, 2023, 5    "critical access hospital" means a hospital designated by 6    the Department of Public Health as a critical access 7    hospital, excluding any hospital meeting the definition of 8    a public hospital in subparagraph (F). 9        (B) Safety-net hospitals, except that stand-alone 10    children's hospitals that are not specialty children's 11    hospitals, safety-net hospitals that elect not to be 12    included as provided in item (i), and, for calendar years 13    2025 and 2026 only, hospitals with over 9,000 Medicaid 14    acute care inpatient admissions per calendar year, 15    excluding admissions for Medicare-Medicaid dual eligible 16    patients, will not be included. For the calendar year 17    beginning January 1, 2023, and each calendar year 18    thereafter, assignment to the safety-net class shall be 19    based on the annual safety-net rate year beginning 15 20    months before the beginning of the first Payout Quarter of 21    the calendar year. 22            (i) Beginning calendar year 2026, all hospitals 23        qualifying as a safety-net hospital under subsection 24        (a) of Section 5-5e.1 for rates years beginning on and 25        after October 1, 2024 shall be permitted to elect to 26        remain in the high Medicaid hospital class as defined   HB5442- 12 -LRB104 20236 KTG 33687 b1        in subparagraph (G) for purposes of the State directed 2        payments described in subsection (r) instead of being 3        assigned to the safety-net fixed pool directed 4        payments class as described in subsection (g).5            (ii) If a hospital elects assignment in the high 6        Medicaid hospital class as defined in subparagraph 7        (G), the hospital must remain in the high Medicaid 8        hospital class for the entire calendar year. 9        (C) Long term acute care hospitals.10        (D) Freestanding psychiatric hospitals.11        (E) Freestanding rehabilitation hospitals.12        (F) Beginning January 1, 2023, "public hospital" means 13    a hospital that is owned or operated by an Illinois 14    Government body or municipality, excluding a hospital 15    provider that is a State agency, a State university, or a 16    county with a population of 3,000,000 or more. 17        (G) High Medicaid hospitals. 18            (i) As used in this Section, "high Medicaid 19        hospital" means a general acute care hospital that:20                (I) For the payout periods July 1, 2020 21            through December 31, 2022, is not a safety-net 22            hospital or critical access hospital and that has 23            a Medicaid Inpatient Utilization Rate above 30% or 24            a hospital that had over 35,000 inpatient Medicaid 25            days during the applicable period. For the period 26            July 1, 2020 through December 31, 2020, the   HB5442- 13 -LRB104 20236 KTG 33687 b1            applicable period for the Medicaid Inpatient 2            Utilization Rate (MIUR) is the rate year 2020 MIUR 3            and for the number of inpatient days it is State 4            fiscal year 2018. Beginning in calendar year 2021, 5            the Department shall use the most recently 6            determined MIUR, as defined in subsection (h) of 7            Section 5-5.02, and for the inpatient day 8            threshold, the State fiscal year ending 18 months 9            prior to the beginning of the calendar year. For 10            purposes of calculating MIUR under this Section, 11            children's hospitals and affiliated general acute 12            care hospitals shall be considered a single 13            hospital.14                (II) For the calendar year beginning January 15            1, 2023, and each calendar year thereafter, is not 16            a public hospital, safety-net hospital, or 17            critical access hospital and that qualifies as a 18            regional high volume hospital or is a hospital 19            that has a Medicaid Inpatient Utilization Rate 20            (MIUR) above 30%. As used in this item, "regional 21            high volume hospital" means a hospital which ranks 22            in the top 2 quartiles based on total hospital 23            services volume, of all eligible general acute 24            care hospitals, when ranked in descending order 25            based on total hospital services volume, within 26            the same Medicaid managed care region, as   HB5442- 14 -LRB104 20236 KTG 33687 b1            designated by the Department, as of January 1, 2            2022. As used in this item, "total hospital 3            services volume" means the total of all Medical 4            Assistance hospital inpatient admissions plus all 5            Medical Assistance hospital outpatient visits. For 6            purposes of determining regional high volume 7            hospital inpatient admissions and outpatient 8            visits, the Department shall use dates of service 9            provided during State Fiscal Year 2020 for the 10            Payout Quarter beginning January 1, 2023. The 11            Department shall use dates of service from the 12            State fiscal year ending 18 month before the 13            beginning of the first Payout Quarter of the 14            subsequent annual determination period. 15            (ii) For the calendar year beginning January 1, 16        2023, the Department shall use the Rate Year 2022 17        Medicaid inpatient utilization rate (MIUR), as defined 18        in subsection (h) of Section 5-5.02. For each 19        subsequent annual determination, the Department shall 20        use the MIUR applicable to the rate year ending 21        September 30 of the year preceding the beginning of 22        the calendar year. 23        (H) General acute care hospitals. As used under this 24    Section, "general acute care hospitals" means all other 25    Illinois hospitals not identified in subparagraphs (A) 26    through (G).  HB5442- 15 -LRB104 20236 KTG 33687 b1    (2) Hospitals' qualification for each class shall be 2assessed prior to the beginning of each calendar year and the 3new class designation shall be effective January 1 of the next 4year. The Department shall publish by rule the process for 5establishing class determination.6    (3) Beginning January 1, 2024, the Department may reassign 7hospitals or entire hospital classes as defined above, if 8federal limits on the payments to the class to which the 9hospitals are assigned based on the criteria in this 10subsection prevent the Department from making payments to the 11class that would otherwise be due under this Section. The 12Department shall publish the criteria and composition of each 13new class based on the reassignments, and the projected impact 14on payments to each hospital under the new classes on its 15website by November 15 of the year before the year in which the 16class changes become effective. 17    (g) Fixed pool directed payments. Beginning July 1, 2020, 18the Department shall issue payments to MCOs which shall be 19used to issue directed payments to qualified Illinois 20safety-net hospitals and critical access hospitals on a 21monthly basis in accordance with this subsection. Prior to the 22beginning of each Payout Quarter beginning July 1, 2020, the 23Department shall use encounter claims data from the 24Determination Quarter, accepted by the Department's Medicaid 25Management Information System for inpatient and outpatient 26services rendered by safety-net hospitals and critical access   HB5442- 16 -LRB104 20236 KTG 33687 b1hospitals to determine a quarterly uniform per unit add-on for 2each hospital class.3        (1) Inpatient per unit add-on. A quarterly uniform per 4    diem add-on shall be derived by dividing the quarterly 5    Inpatient Directed Payments Pool amount allocated to the 6    applicable hospital class by the total inpatient days 7    contained on all encounter claims received during the 8    Determination Quarter, for all hospitals in the class.9            (A) Each hospital in the class shall have a 10        quarterly inpatient directed payment calculated that 11        is equal to the product of the number of inpatient days 12        attributable to the hospital used in the calculation 13        of the quarterly uniform class per diem add-on, 14        multiplied by the calculated applicable quarterly 15        uniform class per diem add-on of the hospital class.16            (B) Each hospital shall be paid 1/3 of its 17        quarterly inpatient directed payment in each of the 3 18        months of the Payout Quarter, in accordance with 19        directions provided to each MCO by the Department.20        (2) Outpatient per unit add-on. A quarterly uniform 21    per claim add-on shall be derived by dividing the 22    quarterly Outpatient Directed Payments Pool amount 23    allocated to the applicable hospital class by the total 24    outpatient encounter claims received during the 25    Determination Quarter, for all hospitals in the class.26            (A) Each hospital in the class shall have a   HB5442- 17 -LRB104 20236 KTG 33687 b1        quarterly outpatient directed payment calculated that 2        is equal to the product of the number of outpatient 3        encounter claims attributable to the hospital used in 4        the calculation of the quarterly uniform class per 5        claim add-on, multiplied by the calculated applicable 6        quarterly uniform class per claim add-on of the 7        hospital class.8            (B) Each hospital shall be paid 1/3 of its 9        quarterly outpatient directed payment in each of the 3 10        months of the Payout Quarter, in accordance with 11        directions provided to each MCO by the Department.12        (3) Each MCO shall pay each hospital the Monthly 13    Directed Payment as identified by the Department on its 14    quarterly determination report.15        (4) Definitions. As used in this subsection:16            (A) "Payout Quarter" means each 3 month calendar 17        quarter, beginning July 1, 2020.18            (B) "Determination Quarter" means each 3 month 19        calendar quarter, which ends 3 months prior to the 20        first day of each Payout Quarter.21        (5) For the period July 1, 2020 through December 2020, 22    the following amounts shall be allocated to the following 23    hospital class directed payment pools for the quarterly 24    development of a uniform per unit add-on:25            (A) $2,894,500 for hospital inpatient services for 26        critical access hospitals.  HB5442- 18 -LRB104 20236 KTG 33687 b1            (B) $4,294,374 for hospital outpatient services 2        for critical access hospitals.3            (C) $29,109,330 for hospital inpatient services 4        for safety-net hospitals.5            (D) $35,041,218 for hospital outpatient services 6        for safety-net hospitals.7        (6) For the period January 1, 2023 through December 8    31, 2023, the Department shall establish the amounts that 9    shall be allocated to the hospital class directed payment 10    fixed pools identified in this paragraph for the quarterly 11    development of a uniform per unit add-on. The Department 12    shall establish such amounts so that the total amount of 13    payments to each hospital under this Section in calendar 14    year 2023 is projected to be substantially similar to the 15    total amount of such payments received by the hospital 16    under this Section in calendar year 2021, adjusted for 17    increased funding provided for fixed pool directed 18    payments under subsection (g) in calendar year 2022, 19    assuming that the volume and acuity of claims are held 20    constant. The Department shall publish the directed 21    payment fixed pool amounts to be established under this 22    paragraph on its website by November 15, 2022. Beginning 23    January 1, 2027, the Department shall remove the hospital 24    classes described in subparagraphs (C) and (D) and 25    instead, subject to any necessary federal approval, enter 26    into intergovernmental agreements with the respective   HB5442- 19 -LRB104 20236 KTG 33687 b1    governing bodies to ensure continued access for those 2    services in rural areas of the State. The Department shall 3    reinstate the hospital classes described in subparagraphs 4    (C) and (D) if approval is not received for such 5    reimbursement by the federal Centers for Medicare and 6    Medicaid Services. 7            (A) Hospital inpatient services for critical 8        access hospitals.9            (B) Hospital outpatient services for critical 10        access hospitals.11            (C) Hospital inpatient services for public 12        hospitals.13            (D) Hospital outpatient services for public 14        hospitals.15            (E) Hospital inpatient services for safety-net 16        hospitals.17            (F) Hospital outpatient services for safety-net 18        hospitals.19        (7) Semi-annual rate maintenance review. The 20    Department shall ensure that hospitals assigned to the 21    fixed pools in paragraph (6) are paid no less than 95% of 22    the annual initial rate for each 6-month period of each 23    annual payout period. For each calendar year, the 24    Department shall calculate the annual initial rate per day 25    and per visit for each fixed pool hospital class listed in 26    paragraph (6), by dividing the total of all applicable   HB5442- 20 -LRB104 20236 KTG 33687 b1    inpatient or outpatient directed payments issued in the 2    preceding calendar year to the hospitals in each fixed 3    pool class for the calendar year, plus any increase 4    resulting from the annual adjustments described in 5    subsection (i), by the actual applicable total service 6    units for the preceding calendar year which were the basis 7    of the total applicable inpatient or outpatient directed 8    payments issued to the hospitals in each fixed pool class 9    in the calendar year, except that for calendar year 2023, 10    the service units from calendar year 2021 shall be used. 11            (A) The Department shall calculate the effective 12        rate, per day and per visit, for the payout periods of 13        January to June and July to December of each year, for 14        each fixed pool listed in paragraph (6), by dividing 15        50% of the annual pool by the total applicable 16        reported service units for the 2 applicable 17        determination quarters.18            (B) If the effective rate calculated in 19        subparagraph (A) is less than 95% of the annual 20        initial rate assigned to the class for each pool under 21        paragraph (6), the Department shall adjust the payment 22        for each hospital to a level equal to no less than 95% 23        of the annual initial rate, by issuing a retroactive 24        adjustment payment for the 6-month period under review 25        as identified in subparagraph (A). 26    (h) Fixed rate directed payments. Effective July 1, 2020,   HB5442- 21 -LRB104 20236 KTG 33687 b1the Department shall issue payments to MCOs which shall be 2used to issue directed payments to Illinois hospitals not 3identified in paragraph (g) on a monthly basis. Prior to the 4beginning of each Payout Quarter beginning July 1, 2020, the 5Department shall use encounter claims data from the 6Determination Quarter, accepted by the Department's Medicaid 7Management Information System for inpatient and outpatient 8services rendered by hospitals in each hospital class 9identified in paragraph (f) and not identified in paragraph 10(g). For the period July 1, 2020 through December 2020, the 11Department shall direct MCOs to make payments as follows:12        (1) For general acute care hospitals an amount equal 13    to $1,750 multiplied by the hospital's category of service 14    20 case mix index for the determination quarter multiplied 15    by the hospital's total number of inpatient admissions for 16    category of service 20 for the determination quarter.17        (2) For general acute care hospitals an amount equal 18    to $160 multiplied by the hospital's category of service 19    21 case mix index for the determination quarter multiplied 20    by the hospital's total number of inpatient admissions for 21    category of service 21 for the determination quarter.22        (3) For general acute care hospitals an amount equal 23    to $80 multiplied by the hospital's category of service 22 24    case mix index for the determination quarter multiplied by 25    the hospital's total number of inpatient admissions for 26    category of service 22 for the determination quarter.  HB5442- 22 -LRB104 20236 KTG 33687 b1        (4) For general acute care hospitals an amount equal 2    to $375 multiplied by the hospital's category of service 3    24 case mix index for the determination quarter multiplied 4    by the hospital's total number of category of service 24 5    paid EAPG (EAPGs) for the determination quarter.6        (5) For general acute care hospitals an amount equal 7    to $240 multiplied by the hospital's category of service 8    27 and 28 case mix index for the determination quarter 9    multiplied by the hospital's total number of category of 10    service 27 and 28 paid EAPGs for the determination 11    quarter.12        (6) For general acute care hospitals an amount equal 13    to $290 multiplied by the hospital's category of service 14    29 case mix index for the determination quarter multiplied 15    by the hospital's total number of category of service 29 16    paid EAPGs for the determination quarter.17        (7) For high Medicaid hospitals an amount equal to 18    $1,800 multiplied by the hospital's category of service 20 19    case mix index for the determination quarter multiplied by 20    the hospital's total number of inpatient admissions for 21    category of service 20 for the determination quarter.22        (8) For high Medicaid hospitals an amount equal to 23    $160 multiplied by the hospital's category of service 21 24    case mix index for the determination quarter multiplied by 25    the hospital's total number of inpatient admissions for 26    category of service 21 for the determination quarter.  HB5442- 23 -LRB104 20236 KTG 33687 b1        (9) For high Medicaid hospitals an amount equal to $80 2    multiplied by the hospital's category of service 22 case 3    mix index for the determination quarter multiplied by the 4    hospital's total number of inpatient admissions for 5    category of service 22 for the determination quarter.6        (10) For high Medicaid hospitals an amount equal to 7    $400 multiplied by the hospital's category of service 24 8    case mix index for the determination quarter multiplied by 9    the hospital's total number of category of service 24 paid 10    EAPG outpatient claims for the determination quarter.11        (11) For high Medicaid hospitals an amount equal to 12    $240 multiplied by the hospital's category of service 27 13    and 28 case mix index for the determination quarter 14    multiplied by the hospital's total number of category of 15    service 27 and 28 paid EAPGs for the determination 16    quarter.17        (12) For high Medicaid hospitals an amount equal to 18    $290 multiplied by the hospital's category of service 29 19    case mix index for the determination quarter multiplied by 20    the hospital's total number of category of service 29 paid 21    EAPGs for the determination quarter.22        (13) For long term acute care hospitals the amount of 23    $495 multiplied by the hospital's total number of 24    inpatient days for the determination quarter.25        (14) For psychiatric hospitals the amount of $210 26    multiplied by the hospital's total number of inpatient   HB5442- 24 -LRB104 20236 KTG 33687 b1    days for category of service 21 for the determination 2    quarter.3        (15) For psychiatric hospitals the amount of $250 4    multiplied by the hospital's total number of outpatient 5    claims for category of service 27 and 28 for the 6    determination quarter.7        (16) For rehabilitation hospitals the amount of $410 8    multiplied by the hospital's total number of inpatient 9    days for category of service 22 for the determination 10    quarter.11        (17) For rehabilitation hospitals the amount of $100 12    multiplied by the hospital's total number of outpatient 13    claims for category of service 29 for the determination 14    quarter.15        (18) Effective for the Payout Quarter beginning 16    January 1, 2023, for the directed payments to hospitals 17    required under this subsection, the Department shall 18    establish the amounts that shall be used to calculate such 19    directed payments using the methodologies specified in 20    this paragraph. The Department shall use a single, uniform 21    rate, adjusted for acuity as specified in paragraphs (1) 22    through (12), for all categories of inpatient services 23    provided by each class of hospitals and a single uniform 24    rate, adjusted for acuity as specified in paragraphs (1) 25    through (12), for all categories of outpatient services 26    provided by each class of hospitals. The Department shall   HB5442- 25 -LRB104 20236 KTG 33687 b1    establish such amounts so that the total amount of 2    payments to each hospital under this Section in calendar 3    year 2023 is projected to be substantially similar to the 4    total amount of such payments received by the hospital 5    under this Section in calendar year 2021, adjusted for 6    increased funding provided for fixed pool directed 7    payments under subsection (g) in calendar year 2022, 8    assuming that the volume and acuity of claims are held 9    constant. The Department shall publish the directed 10    payment amounts to be established under this subsection on 11    its website by November 15, 2022. 12        (19) Each hospital shall be paid 1/3 of their 13    quarterly inpatient and outpatient directed payment in 14    each of the 3 months of the Payout Quarter, in accordance 15    with directions provided to each MCO by the Department.16        (20) Each MCO shall pay each hospital the Monthly 17    Directed Payment amount as identified by the Department on 18    its quarterly determination report.19    Notwithstanding any other provision of this subsection, if 20the Department determines that the actual total hospital 21utilization data that is used to calculate the fixed rate 22directed payments is substantially different than anticipated 23when the rates in this subsection were initially determined 24for unforeseeable circumstances (such as the COVID-19 pandemic 25or some other public health emergency), the Department may 26adjust the rates specified in this subsection so that the   HB5442- 26 -LRB104 20236 KTG 33687 b1total directed payments approximate the total spending amount 2anticipated when the rates were initially established. 3    Definitions. As used in this subsection:4            (A) "Payout Quarter" means each calendar quarter, 5        beginning July 1, 2020.6            (B) "Determination Quarter" means each calendar 7        quarter which ends 3 months prior to the first day of 8        each Payout Quarter.9            (C) "Case mix index" means a hospital specific 10        calculation. For inpatient claims the case mix index 11        is calculated each quarter by summing the relative 12        weight of all inpatient Diagnosis-Related Group (DRG) 13        claims for a category of service in the applicable 14        Determination Quarter and dividing the sum by the 15        number of sum total of all inpatient DRG admissions 16        for the category of service for the associated claims. 17        The case mix index for outpatient claims is calculated 18        each quarter by summing the relative weight of all 19        paid EAPGs in the applicable Determination Quarter and 20        dividing the sum by the sum total of paid EAPGs for the 21        associated claims.22    (i) Beginning January 1, 2021, the rates for directed 23payments shall be recalculated in order to spend the 24additional funds for directed payments that result from 25reduction in the amount of pass-through payments allowed under 26federal regulations. The additional funds for directed   HB5442- 27 -LRB104 20236 KTG 33687 b1payments shall be allocated proportionally to each class of 2hospitals based on that class' proportion of services.3        (1) Beginning January 1, 2024, the fixed pool directed 4    payment amounts and the associated annual initial rates 5    referenced in paragraph (6) of subsection (f) for each 6    hospital class shall be uniformly increased by a ratio of 7    not less than, the ratio of the total pass-through 8    reduction amount pursuant to paragraph (4) of subsection 9    (j), for the hospitals comprising the hospital fixed pool 10    directed payment class for the next calendar year, to the 11    total inpatient and outpatient directed payments for the 12    hospitals comprising the hospital fixed pool directed 13    payment class paid during the preceding calendar year. 14        (2) Beginning January 1, 2024, the fixed rates for the 15    directed payments referenced in paragraph (18) of 16    subsection (h) for each hospital class shall be uniformly 17    increased by a ratio of not less than, the ratio of the 18    total pass-through reduction amount pursuant to paragraph 19    (4) of subsection (j), for the hospitals comprising the 20    hospital directed payment class for the next calendar 21    year, to the total inpatient and outpatient directed 22    payments for the hospitals comprising the hospital fixed 23    rate directed payment class paid during the preceding 24    calendar year. 25    (j) Pass-through payments.26        (1) For the period July 1, 2020 through December 31,   HB5442- 28 -LRB104 20236 KTG 33687 b1    2020, the Department shall assign quarterly pass-through 2    payments to each class of hospitals equal to one-fourth of 3    the following annual allocations:4            (A) $390,487,095 to safety-net hospitals.5            (B) $62,553,886 to critical access hospitals.6            (C) $345,021,438 to high Medicaid hospitals.7            (D) $551,429,071 to general acute care hospitals.8            (E) $27,283,870 to long term acute care hospitals.9            (F) $40,825,444 to freestanding psychiatric 10        hospitals.11            (G) $9,652,108 to freestanding rehabilitation 12        hospitals.13        (2) For the period of July 1, 2020 through December 14    31, 2020, the pass-through payments shall at a minimum 15    ensure hospitals receive a total amount of monthly 16    payments under this Section as received in calendar year 17    2019 in accordance with this Article and paragraph (1) of 18    subsection (d-5) of Section 14-12, exclusive of amounts 19    received through payments referenced in subsection (b).20        (3) For the calendar year beginning January 1, 2023, 21    the Department shall establish the annual pass-through 22    allocation to each class of hospitals and the pass-through 23    payments to each hospital so that the total amount of 24    payments to each hospital under this Section in calendar 25    year 2023 is projected to be substantially similar to the 26    total amount of such payments received by the hospital   HB5442- 29 -LRB104 20236 KTG 33687 b1    under this Section in calendar year 2021, adjusted for 2    increased funding provided for fixed pool directed 3    payments under subsection (g) in calendar year 2022, 4    assuming that the volume and acuity of claims are held 5    constant. The Department shall publish the pass-through 6    allocation to each class and the pass-through payments to 7    each hospital to be established under this subsection on 8    its website by November 15, 2022. 9        (4) For the calendar years beginning January 1, 2021 10    and January 1, 2022, each hospital's pass-through payment 11    amount shall be reduced proportionally to the reduction of 12    all pass-through payments required by federal regulations. 13    Beginning January 1, 2024, the Department shall reduce 14    total pass-through payments by the minimum amount 15    necessary to comply with federal regulations. Pass-through 16    payments to safety-net hospitals, as defined in Section 17    5-5e.1 of this Code, shall not be reduced until all 18    pass-through payments to other hospitals have been 19    eliminated. All other hospitals shall have their 20    pass-through payments reduced proportionally. 21    (k) At least 30 days prior to each calendar year, the 22Department shall notify each hospital of changes to the 23payment methodologies in this Section, including, but not 24limited to, changes in the fixed rate directed payment rates, 25the aggregate pass-through payment amount for all hospitals, 26and the hospital's pass-through payment amount for the   HB5442- 30 -LRB104 20236 KTG 33687 b1upcoming calendar year.2    (l) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this Section, 3the Department may adopt rules to change the methodology for 4directed and pass-through payments as set forth in this 5Section, but only to the extent necessary to obtain federal 6approval of a necessary State Plan amendment or Directed 7Payment Preprint or to otherwise conform to federal law or 8federal regulation.9    (m) As used in this subsection, "managed care 10organization" or "MCO" means an entity which contracts with 11the Department to provide services where payment for medical 12services is made on a capitated basis, excluding contracted 13entities for dual eligible or Department of Children and 14Family Services youth populations.15    (n) In order to address the escalating infant mortality 16rates among minority communities in Illinois, the State shall, 17subject to appropriation, create a pool of funding of at least 18$50,000,000 annually to be disbursed among safety-net 19hospitals that maintain perinatal designation from the 20Department of Public Health. The funding shall be used to 21preserve or enhance OB/GYN services or other specialty 22services at the receiving hospital, with the distribution of 23funding to be established by rule and with consideration to 24perinatal hospitals with safe birthing levels and quality 25metrics for healthy mothers and babies.26    (o) In order to address the growing challenges of   HB5442- 31 -LRB104 20236 KTG 33687 b1providing stable access to healthcare in rural Illinois, 2including perinatal services, behavioral healthcare including 3substance use disorder services (SUDs) and other specialty 4services, and to expand access to telehealth services among 5rural communities in Illinois, the Department of Healthcare 6and Family Services shall administer a program to provide at 7least $10,000,000 in financial support annually to critical 8access hospitals for delivery of perinatal and OB/GYN 9services, behavioral healthcare including SUDS, other 10specialty services and telehealth services. The funding shall 11be used to preserve or enhance perinatal and OB/GYN services, 12behavioral healthcare including SUDS, other specialty 13services, as well as the explanation of telehealth services by 14the receiving hospital, with the distribution of funding to be 15established by rule. 16    (p) For calendar year 2023, the final amounts, rates, and 17payments under subsections (c), (d-2), (g), (h), and (j) shall 18be established by the Department, so that the sum of the total 19estimated annual payments under subsections (c), (d-2), (g), 20(h), and (j) for each hospital class for calendar year 2023, is 21no less than: 22        (1) $858,260,000 to safety-net hospitals.23        (2) $86,200,000 to critical access hospitals.24        (3) $1,765,000,000 to high Medicaid hospitals.25        (4) $673,860,000 to general acute care hospitals.26        (5) $48,330,000 to long term acute care hospitals.  HB5442- 32 -LRB104 20236 KTG 33687 b1        (6) $89,110,000 to freestanding psychiatric hospitals.2        (7) $24,300,000 to freestanding rehabilitation 3    hospitals.4        (8) $32,570,000 to public hospitals.5    (q) Hospital Pandemic Recovery Stabilization Payments. The 6Department shall disburse a pool of $460,000,000 in stability 7payments to hospitals prior to April 1, 2023. The allocation 8of the pool shall be based on the hospital directed payment 9classes and directed payments issued, during Calendar Year 102022 with added consideration to safety net hospitals, as 11defined in subdivision (f)(1)(B) of this Section, and critical 12access hospitals. 13    (r) Directed payment update. For calendar year 2025, and 14each calendar year thereafter, the final amounts, rates, and 15payments for the fixed pool directed payments described in 16subsection (g) and the fixed rate directed payments described 17in subsection (h) shall be established by the Department at no 18less than the following:19        (1) $579,261,585 for inpatient services at safety-net 20    hospitals.21        (2) $763,418,138 for outpatient services at safety-net 22    hospitals.23        (3) $12,389,160 for inpatient services at critical 24    access hospitals.25        (4) $137,437,866 for outpatient services at critical 26    access hospitals.  HB5442- 33 -LRB104 20236 KTG 33687 b1        (5) $5,418 as a base fixed rate per admit prior to 2    adjusting for acuity, for inpatient services at high 3    Medicaid hospitals.4        (6) $1,512 as a base fixed rate per paid E-APG prior to 5    adjusting for acuity, for outpatient services at high 6    Medicaid hospitals.7        (7) $3,898 as a base fixed rate per admit prior to 8    adjusting for acuity, for inpatient services at other 9    acute care hospitals.10        (8) $1,322 as a base fixed rate per E-APG prior to 11    adjusting for acuity, for outpatient services at other 12    acute hospitals.13        (9) $773 per day for inpatient services at long term 14    acute care hospitals.15        (10) $206 per day for inpatient services at 16    freestanding psychiatric hospitals.17        (11) $223 per claim for outpatient services at 18    freestanding psychiatric hospitals.19        (12) $776 per day for inpatient services at 20    freestanding rehabilitation hospitals.21        (13) $252 per claim for outpatient services at 22    freestanding rehabilitation hospitals.23        (14) $7,793,812 for inpatient services at public 24    hospitals.25        (15) $26,849,592 for outpatient services at public 26    hospitals.  HB5442- 34 -LRB104 20236 KTG 33687 b1    Implementation of the rate increases described in this 2subsection (r) shall be contingent on federal approval. The 3rates for fixed pool directed payments as described in 4subsection (g) and for fixed rate directed payments as 5described in subsection (h) shall remain as published by the 6Department on November 27, 2024 until the Department receives 7federal approval for the updated rates described in this 8subsection (r). 9    (s) If, in order to secure approval by the Centers for 10Medicare and Medicaid Services, the rates under subsection (r) 11are reduced, the Department may submit a State Plan amendment 12to increase rates in place at the time of the reduction 13pertaining to subsection (d-2) to offset the annual amount of 14reduction to the rates under subsection (r), in amounts equal 15to the required reduction on a class-specific basis to ensure 16that funds are not reallocated from one class to another; or 17the rates in subsection (r) shall be reduced uniformly to the 18amounts necessary to achieve approval and the assessments 19imposed by subsection (a) or (b-5) of Section 5A-2 shall be 20reduced uniformly to achieve a total annual reduction across 21both assessments equal to the product of the total annual 22reduction to payments and .3853. In addition, the assessments 23shall further be reduced uniformly to achieve a total annual 24reduction across both assessments equal to the difference of 25subtracting the product calculated in the previous sentence 26from the resulting quotient of dividing the product described   HB5442- 35 -LRB104 20236 KTG 33687 b1in the previous sentence by .92 for a reduction to the 2transfers in subsection 7.16 and 7.17 of Section 5A-8.3    (t) To provide for the expeditious and timely 4implementation of the changes made to this Section by this 5amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly, the Department 6may adopt emergency rules as authorized by Section 5-45 of the 7Illinois Administrative Procedure Act. The adoption of 8emergency rules is deemed to be necessary for the public 9interest, safety, and welfare. 10(Source: P.A. 103-102, eff. 6-16-23; 103-593, eff. 6-7-24; 11103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 104-7, eff. 6-16-25.) 12    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 131, 2027.